Louisiana, session 2026, HB884.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:555(A)(introductory paragraph) and 622(A)(introductory
paragraph), (1), (2), and (4) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
15:555(A)(18) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§555. Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission; creation; membership;
meetings
A. The Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission is hereby created
within the Department of Justice, office of the attorney general., The commission
and shall consist of the following members:
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1042 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 884
(18) A member with experience in forensic medical examinations provided
to victims of sexually-oriented criminal offenses who is selected by the Department
of Justice, office of the attorney general.
* * *
§622. Sexual assault collection kits
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Criminal justice agency" means any government agency or subunit
thereof, or of that agency or a private agency that, through statutory authorization or
a legal formal agreement with a governmental unit or agency, has does any of the
following:
(a) Has the power of investigation, arrest, detention, prosecution,
adjudication, treatment, supervision, rehabilitation or release of persons suspected,
charged, or convicted of a crime; or that collects,.
(b) Collects, stores, processes, transmits, or disseminates criminal history
record or crime information.
(2) "Forensic medical examination" means an examination provided to the
victim of a sexually oriented sexually-oriented criminal offense by a health care
healthcare provider for the purpose of gathering and preserving evidence of a sexual
assault for use in a court of law. A forensic medical examination shall include the
following:
* * *
(4) "Sexually oriented Sexually-oriented criminal offense" shall have has the
same meaning as sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541(24).
* * *
C. By March 1, 2015, the Louisiana State Police Crime Laboratory shall
prepare and transmit a report to the chairman of the Senate Committee on Judiciary
B and the chairman of the House of Representatives Committee on Judiciary
containing the following:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1042 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 884
(1) The number of untested sexual assault collection kits being stored by
each parish, by and each criminal justice agency, and the date the untested kit was
collected.
(2) The report shall also include the The name and contact information of
each criminal justice agency that failed to submit the report required by Subsection
B of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1216.1(A)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1216.1. Procedures for survivors of a sexually oriented sexually-oriented criminal
offense; immunity; regional plans; maximum allowable costs; definitions;
documents requested by victim
A. All licensed hospitals and healthcare providers in Louisiana this state
shall offer every sexual assault survivor information to receive the treatment
provided for in this Section. A licensed hospital or healthcare provider shall adhere
to the following procedures if a person presents for treatment as a sexual assault
survivor:
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 46:2166(A)(19) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2166. Composition of the commission
A. The commission shall be composed of the following members:
* * *
(19) A member with experience in forensic medical examinations provided
to victims of sexually-oriented criminal offenses who is selected by the Department
of Justice, office of the attorney general.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1042 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 884